Utah statutes.
11-45-204.   Board to make rules establishing criteria.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the board shall make rules to determine:
(a)  eligibility for a loan; and
(b)  priorities among energy efficiency projects.
(2)  When making a rule to determine priorities among energy efficiency
projects, the board may consider the following:
(a)  possible additional sources of revenue;
(b)  feasibility and practicality of an energy efficiency project;
(c)  energy savings;
(d)  annual energy cost savings;
(e)  projected energy cost payback;
(f)  financial need of the public facility owner;
(g)  environmental and other benefits to the state and local community; and
(h)  availability of federal funds.
